Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF5068.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin STATE LAND EASEMENT; CROW WING COUNTY.new text end new text begin (a) The commissioner of natural resources must grant a perpetual ingress, egress, and utility easement 33 feet wide over, under, and across the state land described in paragraph (b) for the benefit of the land described in paragraph (c). new text end new text begin (b) The land to be subject to the easement is located in Crow Wing County and is described as: that part of the Southeast Quarter of the Southeast Quarter of Section 8 and the Southwest Quarter of the Southwest Quarter of Section 9, Township 46, Range 29. new text end new text begin (c) The land to benefit from the easement is located in Crow Wing County and is described as: Lot 3 and the Northwest Quarter of the Southwest Quarter of Section 9, Township 46, Range 29. new text end new text begin (d) The easement required under this section is described as follows: a 33 foot wide perpetual ingress, egress, and utility easement over, under, and across that part of the Southeast Quarter of the Southeast Quarter of Section 8 and the Southwest Quarter of the Southwest Quarter of Section 9, Township 46, Range 29, Crow Wing County, Minnesota. The centerline of said easement is described as follows: commencing at the southeast corner of said Southeast Quarter of the Southeast Quarter; thence South 89 degrees 46 minutes 15 seconds West, bearings based on the Crow Wing County coordinate system (NAD83), along the south line of said Southeast Quarter of the Southeast Quarter a distance of 16.50 feet to the point of beginning; thence North 13 degrees 48 minutes 50 seconds East 44.57 feet; thence northerly 39.25 feet along a tangential curve concave to the West having a radius of 100 feet and a central angle of 22 degrees 29 minutes 17 seconds; thence North 08 degrees 40 minutes 26 seconds West, tangent to said curve, 68.41 feet; thence North 58 degrees 58 minutes 01 seconds West 86.35 feet; thence North 26 degrees 56 minutes 00 seconds West 53.61 feet; thence northeasterly 684.36 feet along a tangential curve concave to the east, having a radius of 400 feet and a central angle of 98 degrees 01 minutes 38 seconds; thence North 71 degrees 05 minutes 38 seconds East 310.14 feet; thence North 69 degrees 00 minutes 36 seconds East 213.92 feet; thence North 65 degrees 41 minutes 16 seconds East 168.51 feet; thence North 60 degrees 48 minutes 10 seconds East 222.02 feet; thence North 53 degrees 42 minutes 31 seconds East 167.69 feet; thence North 38 degrees 06 minutes 26 seconds East 86.91 feet to the north line of said Southwest Quarter of the Southwest Quarter and there terminating said centerline. The sidelines of said easement are to be prolonged or shortened to begin at the south line of said Southeast Quarter of the Southeast Quarter and terminate at the north line of said Southwest Quarter of the Southwest Quarter. new text end